Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 3. Services and Facilities.

Sec. 42.06.310.
Standards of service and facilities.

Each oil or gas pipeline facility shall furnish and maintain adequate, efficient, and safe service and facilities. This service shall be reasonably continuous and without unreasonable interruption or delay.

If the commission, upon its own motion or upon complaint, after providing reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing, finds that the service or facilities of an oil or gas pipeline facility are unreasonable, unsafe, inadequate, insufficient, or unreasonably discriminatory, or otherwise in violation of this chapter, the commission shall prescribe by regulation or order, the reasonable, safe, adequate, sufficient service or facilities to be observed, furnished, enforced, or employed, including all repairs, changes, alterations, extensions, substitutions, or improvements in facilities that are reasonably necessary and proper for the safety, accommodation, and convenience of the public and the users. Regulations or orders issued under this subsection shall conform to accepted industry standards and practices.

Every common carrier shall, when ordered by the commission, extend or enlarge its pipeline or storage facilities provided the extension or enlargement shall be found to be reasonable and required in the public interest and that the expense involved will not impair the ability of the common carrier or public utility to perform its duty to the public.

The requirement of (c) of this section does not apply to a North Slope natural gas pipeline carrier to the extent that the capacity of the carrier’s North Slope natural gas pipeline does not allow for expanded capacity, and does not apply to require a North Slope natural gas pipeline carrier to enlarge or extend its North Slope natural gas pipeline system. However, the commission may require a North Slope natural gas pipeline carrier to expand, enlarge, or extend its North Slope natural gas pipeline system if, after notice and opportunity for hearing, the commission determines that

a person making a request for expanded, enlarged, or extended service by a North Slope natural gas pipeline carrier has made a firm contractual commitment to the North Slope natural gas pipeline carrier to transport North Slope natural gas; and

the expansion, enlargement, or extension will not result in

substantial injury, including economic injury, to the North Slope natural gas pipeline facility or its customers;

substantial detriment to the services furnished by the North Slope natural gas pipeline facility; or

the creation of safety hazards.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am § 29 ch 3 FSSLA 1973; am § 90 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 5 ch 56 SLA 2000)

Collateral references. —

What constitutes abandonment of facilities or service, under § 7(b) of Natural Gas Act (15 USCS § 717f(b)). 61 ALR Fed. 454.

Sec. 42.06.320.
Discrimination in service.

An oil or gas pipeline carrier may not, as to service, make or grant an unreasonable preference or advantage to any person or subject any person to an unreasonable prejudice or disadvantage. An oil or gas pipeline facility that is owned by more than one owner may not require that users make separate requests of each separate owner in order to obtain a reasonable share of the service provided by the oil or gas pipeline facility.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)

Sec. 42.06.330.
Power of commission to allocate usage.

If the commission, upon its own motion or upon complaint, after providing reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing, finds that an oil or gas pipeline facility is making or granting an unreasonable preference or advantage to any person or subjecting any person to an unreasonable prejudice or discrimination, the commission may prescribe rules to end the discrimination or the commission may itself prescribe the allocation of the service until it determines the discrimination can be avoided by appropriate rule or agreement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)

Sec. 42.06.340.
Order for joint use or connection.

When there is failure to agree upon the joint use or interconnection of oil or gas pipeline facilities or the conditions or compensation for joint use or interconnections, any interested person may apply to the commission for an order requiring the interconnection. If, after investigation and opportunity for hearing, the commission finds that public convenience and necessity require the joint use or connection, and that the use or connection will not result in substantial injury to the oil or gas pipeline facility or its customers, or in substantial detriment to the services furnished by the oil or gas pipeline facility, or in the creation of safety hazards, it shall

order that the use be permitted;

prescribe reasonable conditions and compensation for the joint use;

order the interconnection to be made;

determine the time and manner of the interconnection;

determine the apportionment of costs and responsibility for operation and maintenance of the interconnection.

During construction of a pipeline, the commission, after investigation and opportunity for hearing and findings as required in (a) of this section, may order the inclusion, within the pipeline at points that it designates, of special fittings including tees, wyes, spools, reducers, enlargers, flanges, flange plates, valves, and valve boxes, to reduce the time and cost of future connections for the injection and removal of gas and oil from the main pipeline, and to maintain and facilitate intrastate commerce. A request for special fittings may be made by the commissioner of natural resources for the state. A request for special fittings and valves may be made to the commission by a local government, person, company, or corporation. The cost of furnishing and installing the special fittings shall be paid by the state. However, if the special fittings are used by a person for a commercial enterprise or by a municipality for the operation of a utility, the commission shall require that the using person or municipality reimburse the state for the cost of furnishing and installing the special fittings.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 5 SSSLA 1974; am § 89 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For applications generally, see 3 AAC 48, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (b), in the first sentence, inserted “of” preceding “special fittings”, and deleted “but not limited to” following “including”; inserted “the special fittings” at the end of the last sentence.